California statutes. Education Code
(2) Warrants for amounts apportioned to school districts and county school service funds for classes maintained by county superintendents of schools and to the county school tuition funds shall be for amounts equal to 0.9 percent in July, 12 percent in August, 13.1 percent in September, and 8 percent in October, November, December, and January, of the amounts certified by the Superintendent as a part of the advance apportionment.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) and subject to the approval of the Director of Finance, the Controller shall issue warrants pursuant to Section 14041 that include the full amount of the apportionment payments for the month of July for a local educational agency for which the county superintendent of schools certifies to the Superintendent of Public Instruction and to the Director of Finance on or before May 15, 2008, that the deferral of warrants pursuant to subdivision (a) will result in qualifying the local educational agency for an emergency apportionment pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 41320) of Chapter 3 of Part 24 of Division 3 of Title 2.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, 3rd Ex. Sess., Ch. 2, Sec. 2.   Effective February 16, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

14041.5.

(a) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 14041, for the 2002–03 fiscal year to the 2013–14 fiscal year, inclusive, and for the 2019–20 to the 2020–21 fiscal year, inclusive, warrants for the principal apportionments for the month of June instead shall be drawn in July of the same calendar year pursuant to the certification made pursuant to Section 41335.

(b) Except as otherwise provided in this section, for purposes of making the computations required by Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the warrants drawn pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be deemed to be “General Fund revenues appropriated to school districts,” as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 41202 for the fiscal year in which the warrants are drawn and included within
 the “total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIIIB” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202, for the fiscal year in which the warrants are drawn.

(c) For the 2003–04 school year, the amount of apportionments for revenue limits computed pursuant to Section 42238 from any of the apportionments made pursuant to Section 14041 that are deemed “General Fund revenues appropriated for school districts,” as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 41202 for the following fiscal year and included within the “total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIII B” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202, for the 2004–05 fiscal year shall be seven hundred twenty-six million two hundred seventy thousand dollars ($726,270,000). Any
 amount in excess of seven hundred twenty-six million two hundred seventy thousand dollars ($726,270,000) that is apportioned in July of 2004 is deemed “General Fund revenues appropriated for school districts,” as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 41202 for the 2003–04 fiscal year and included within the “total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIII B” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202, for the 2003–04 fiscal year.

(d) For the 2004–05 school year to the 2007–08 school year, inclusive, the amount of apportionments for revenue limits computed pursuant to Section 42238 from any of the apportionments made pursuant to Section 14041 that are deemed “General Fund revenues appropriated for school districts,” as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 41202 for the following fiscal year and included within the “total allocations to school
 districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIIIB” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202, for the following fiscal year shall be seven hundred fifteen million one hundred eighteen thousand dollars ($715,118,000). Any amount in excess of seven hundred fifteen million one hundred eighteen thousand dollars ($715,118,000) that is apportioned in July of any year is deemed “General Fund revenues appropriated for school districts,” as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 41202 for the prior fiscal year and included within the “total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIIIB” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202, for the prior fiscal year.

(e) For the 2008–09 school year to the 2013–14 school year, inclusive, the amount of
 apportionments for revenue limits computed pursuant to Section 42238 from any of the apportionments made pursuant to Section 14041 that are deemed “General Fund revenues appropriated for school districts,” as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 41202 for the following fiscal year and included within the “total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIIIB” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202, for the following fiscal year shall be one billion one hundred one million six hundred fifty-five thousand dollars ($1,101,655,000). Any amount in excess of one billion one hundred one million six hundred fifty-five thousand dollars ($1,101,655,000) that is apportioned in July of any year is deemed “General Fund revenues appropriated for school districts,” as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 41202 for the prior fiscal year and included within the “total allocations to school districts
 and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIIIB” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202, for the prior fiscal year.

(f) (1) (A) For the 2019–20 fiscal year, the amount of apportionments made pursuant to Section 14041 that are deemed “General Fund revenues appropriated for school districts,” as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 41202 for the 2020–21 fiscal year and included within the “total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIIIB” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202, for the 2020–21 fiscal year shall be one billion eight hundred fifty million three hundred seventy-seven thousand dollars ($1,850,377,000). Any amount in excess of one billion eight hundred fifty million three
 hundred seventy-seven thousand dollars ($1,850,377,000) that is apportioned in July 2020 is deemed “General Fund revenues appropriated for school districts,” as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 41202 for the 2019–20 fiscal year and included within the “total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIIIB” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202, for the 2019–20 fiscal year.

(B) For the 2020–21 fiscal year, the amount of apportionments made pursuant to Section 14041 that are deemed “General Fund revenues appropriated for school districts,” as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 41202 for the 2021–22 fiscal year and included within the “total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIIIB” as defined in
 subdivision (e) of Section 41202, for the 2021–22 fiscal year shall be two billion three hundred seventy-five million three hundred eight thousand dollars ($2,375,308,000). Any amount in excess of two billion three hundred seventy-five million three hundred eight thousand dollars ($2,375,308,000) that is apportioned in July 2021 is deemed “General Fund revenues appropriated for school districts,” as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 41202 for the 2020–21 fiscal year and included within the “total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIIIB” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202, for the 2020–21 fiscal year.

(2) For the 2019–20 fiscal year, the principal apportionment deferred from June to July pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be paid by the Controller no later than July 15, 2020.

(g) (1) For the 2022–23 fiscal year, eighty-eight million four hundred seventy-one thousand dollars ($88,471,000) of the amount of apportionments made pursuant to Section 14041 shall be deemed “General Fund revenues appropriated for school districts,” as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 41202 for the 2021–22 fiscal year and included within the “total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIIIB” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202, for the 2021–22 fiscal year.

(2) For the 2023–24 fiscal year, one billion five hundred sixty-eight million two hundred sixty-three thousand dollars ($1,568,263,000) of the amount of apportionments made pursuant to Section 14041 shall be deemed “General Fund revenues appropriated for school districts,”
 as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 41202 for the 2021–22 fiscal year and included within the “total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIIIB” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202, for the 2021–22 fiscal year.

(3) For the 2023–24 fiscal year, three billion six hundred forty-one million six hundred ninety-four thousand dollars ($3,641,694,000) of the amount of apportionments made pursuant to Section 14041 shall be deemed “General Fund revenues appropriated for school districts,” as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 41202 for the 2024–25 fiscal
 year and included within the “total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIIIB” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202, for the 2024–25 fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 65, Sec. 22.   (AB 126)   Effective July 9, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

14041.6.

(a) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 14041, or any other law, for the 2008–09 fiscal year, warrants for the principal apportionments for the month of February in the amount of two billion dollars ($2,000,000,000) instead shall be drawn in July of the same calendar year pursuant to the certification made pursuant to Section 41339.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 14041, or any other law, for the 2009–10 fiscal year, warrants for the principal apportionments for the month of February in the amount of two billion dollars ($2,000,000,000) instead shall be drawn in July of the same calendar year, and warrants for the month of April in the amount of six hundred seventy-eight million six hundred eleven thousand dollars ($678,611,000) and for
 the month of May in the amount of one billion dollars ($1,000,000,000) instead shall be drawn in August pursuant to the certification made pursuant to Section 41339.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 14041, or any other law, for the 2010–11 fiscal year, warrants for the principal apportionments for the month of February in the amount of two billion dollars ($2,000,000,000), for the month of April in the amount of four hundred nineteen million twenty thousand dollars ($419,020,000), for the month of May in the amount of eight hundred million dollars ($800,000,000), and for the month of June in the amount of five hundred million dollars ($500,000,000) instead shall be drawn in July of the same calendar year, and warrants for the month of April in the amount of six hundred seventy-eight million six hundred eleven thousand dollars ($678,611,000) and for the month of May in the amount of one billion dollars ($1,000,000,000) instead
 shall be drawn in August pursuant to the certification made pursuant to Section 41339.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 14041, or any other law, for the 2011–12 fiscal year, warrants for the principal apportionments for the month of February in the amount of two billion dollars ($2,000,000,000), for the month of April in the amount of four hundred nineteen million twenty thousand dollars ($419,020,000), for the month of May in the amount of eight hundred million dollars ($800,000,000), and for the month of June in the amount of five hundred million dollars ($500,000,000) instead shall be drawn in July of the same calendar year, and warrants for the month of March in the amount of one billion three hundred million dollars ($1,300,000,000), for the month of April in the amount of one billion four hundred forty-two million four hundred five thousand dollars ($1,442,405,000), and for the month of May in the amount of one billion
 dollars ($1,000,000,000) instead shall be drawn in August pursuant to the certification made pursuant to Section 41339.

(e) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 14041, or any other law, for the 2012–13 fiscal year, warrants for the principal apportionments for the month of February in the amount of five hundred thirty-one million seven hundred twenty thousand dollars ($531,720,000), for the month of April in the amount of five hundred ninety-four million seven hundred forty-eight thousand dollars ($594,748,000), for the month of May in the amount of one billion nine hundred seventy-six million seven hundred one thousand dollars ($1,976,701,000), and for the month of June in the amount of five hundred million dollars ($500,000,000) instead shall be drawn in July of the same calendar year, and warrants for the month of March in the amount of one billion twenty-nine million four hundred ninety-three thousand dollars ($1,029,493,000) and for
 the month of April in the amount of seven hundred sixty-three million seven hundred ninety-four thousand dollars ($763,794,000) instead shall be drawn in August pursuant to the certification made pursuant to Section 41339.

(f) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 14041, or any other law, for the 2013–14 fiscal year, warrants for the principal apportionments for the month of April in the amount of nine hundred seventeen million five hundred forty-two thousand dollars ($917,542,000), for the month of May in the amount of two billion one hundred fifty-two million four hundred thirty thousand dollars ($2,152,430,000), and for the month of June in the amount of five hundred million dollars ($500,000,000) instead shall be drawn in July of the same calendar year pursuant to the certification made pursuant to Section 41339.

(g) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 14041, or
 any other law, for the 2013–14 fiscal year, warrants for the principal apportionments for the month of May in the amount of two hundred million dollars ($200,000,000) and for the month of June in the amount of six hundred ninety-nine million four hundred seventy-three thousand dollars ($699,473,000) instead shall be drawn in July of the same calendar year pursuant to the certification made pursuant to Section 41339. The Superintendent shall allocate this deferred amount and repayment to local educational agencies based on their proportionate share of funding appropriated to local educational agencies pursuant to Section 92 of Chapter 38 of the Statutes of 2012.

(h) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 14041, or any other law, for the 2014–15 fiscal year, warrants for the principal apportionments for the month of June in the amount of eight hundred ninety-seven million one hundred eighty-four thousand dollars ($897,184,000) instead shall
 be drawn in July of the same calendar year pursuant to the certification made pursuant to Section 41339.

(i) (1) (A) Except as provided in Section 14041.65 and notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 14041, or any other law, for the 2020–21 fiscal year, warrants for the principal apportionments for the month of February in the amount of one billion five hundred forty million three hundred three thousand dollars ($1,540,303,000) shall instead be drawn in November of the same calendar year pursuant to the certification made pursuant to Section 41332.

(B) Except as provided in Section 14041.65 and notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 14041, or any other law, for the 2020–21 fiscal year, warrants for the principal apportionments for the month of March in the amount of two billion three hundred seventy-five million three hundred
 eight thousand dollars ($2,375,308,000) shall instead be drawn in October of the same calendar year pursuant to the certification made pursuant to Section 41332.

(C) Except as provided in Section 14041.65 and notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 14041, or any other law, for the 2020–21 fiscal year, warrants for the principal apportionments for the month of April in the amount of two billion three hundred seventy-five million three hundred eight thousand dollars ($2,375,308,000) shall instead be drawn in September of the same calendar year pursuant to the certification made pursuant to Section 41332.

(D) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 14041, or any other law, for the 2020–21 fiscal year, warrants for the principal apportionments for the month of May in the amount of two billion three hundred seventy-five million three hundred eight thousand dollars
 ($2,375,308,000) shall instead be drawn in August of the same calendar year pursuant to the certification made pursuant to Section 41335.

(2) Pursuant to Section 8.28 of the Budget Act of 2020 (Chs. 6 and 7, Stats. 2020), if the Director of Finance determines that there are sufficient federal funds provided to the state for the 2020–21 fiscal year that may be used to offset the deferral of payments in the amount specified in Section 8.28 of the Budget Act of 2020 (Chs. 6 and 7, Stats. 2020), the Director of Finance shall reduce the amounts described in
 paragraph (1). In reducing these amounts, the Director of Finance shall first reduce the amounts deferred from any months occurring earliest in the 2020–21 fiscal year.

(j) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 14041, or any other law, for the 2024–25 fiscal year, warrants for the principal apportionments for the month of June in the amount of two hundred forty-five million six hundred four thousand dollars ($245,604,000) or the total June principal apportionment payment, whichever is less, shall instead be drawn in July of the same calendar year pursuant to Section
 41335.

(k) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 14041, or any other law, for the 2025–26 fiscal year, warrants for the principal apportionments for the month of June in the amount of one billion eight hundred seventy-four million seven hundred eighty-one thousand dollars ($1,874,781,000), or the total June principal apportionment payment, whichever is less, shall instead be drawn in July of the same calendar year pursuant to Section 41335.

(l) Except as provided in subdivisions (c) and (e) of Section 41202, for purposes of making the computations required by Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the warrants drawn pursuant to subdivisions (a) to (j), inclusive, shall be deemed to be “General Fund revenues appropriated for school districts,” as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 41202, for the fiscal year in which the warrants are drawn and included within the “total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIIIB,” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202, for the fiscal year in which the warrants are drawn.

(m) Notwithstanding subdivision
(l), for purposes of making the computations required by Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, one billion five hundred ninety million four hundred forty-nine thousand dollars ($1,590,449,000) of the warrants drawn in August of 2013 pursuant to subdivision (e) shall be deemed to be “General Fund revenues appropriated for school districts,” as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 41202, for the 2012–13 fiscal year, and included within the “total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIIIB,” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202, for the 2012–13 fiscal year.

(n) Notwithstanding subdivision
(l) of this section and subdivision (e) of Section 14041.5, for purposes of making the computations required by Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, one billion two hundred ninety-four million seven hundred twenty thousand dollars ($1,294,720,000) of the warrants drawn in July 2014 pursuant to subdivisions (f) and (g) of this section and subdivision (e) of Section 14041.5 shall be deemed to be “General Fund revenues appropriated for school districts,” as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 41202, for the 2012–13 fiscal year, and included within the “total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIIIB,” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202, for the 2012–13 fiscal year.

(o) Notwithstanding subdivision
 (l) of this section and subdivision (e) of Section 14041.5, for purposes of making the computations required by Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, two billion seven hundred eighty million five hundred twenty-six thousand dollars ($2,780,526,000) of the warrants drawn in July 2014 pursuant to subdivisions (f) and (g) of this section and subdivision (e) of Section 14041.5 shall be deemed to be “General Fund revenues appropriated for school districts,” as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 41202, for the 2013–14 fiscal year, and included within the “total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIIIB,” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202, for the 2013–14 fiscal year.

(p) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (l) of this section and subdivision (f) of Section 14041.5, for purposes of making the computations required by Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, eight billion forty-one million five hundred thirty-five thousand dollars ($8,041,535,000) of the warrants drawn in the 2021–22 fiscal year pursuant to subdivision (i) shall be deemed to be “General Fund revenues appropriated for school districts,” as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 41202, for the 2020–21 fiscal year, and included within the “total allocations to school districts and community college districts
 from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIIIB,” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202, for the 2020–21 fiscal year.

(2) Notwithstanding subdivision (l) of this section and subdivision (f) of Section 14041.5, for purposes of making the computations required by Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, six hundred twenty-four million six hundred ninety-two thousand dollars ($624,692,000) of the warrants drawn in the 2021–22 fiscal year pursuant to subdivision (i) shall be deemed to be “General Fund revenues appropriated for school districts,” as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 41202, for the fiscal year in which the warrants are drawn, and included within the
 “total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIIIB,” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202, for the fiscal year in which the warrants are drawn.

(q) For purposes of making the computations required by Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the amount of two hundred forty-six million six hundred four thousand dollars ($246,604,000) of the appropriations made in subdivision (j) shall be deemed to be “General Fund revenues appropriated for school districts,” as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 41202, for the 2025–26 fiscal year, and included within the “total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIIIB,” as defined in subdivision (e) of
 Section 41202, for the 2025–26 fiscal year.

(r) For purposes of making the computations required by Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the amount of one billion eight hundred seventy-four million seven hundred eighty-one thousand dollars ($1,874,781,000) shall be deemed to be “General Fund revenues appropriated for school districts,” as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 41202, for the 2026–27 fiscal year, and included within the “total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIIIB,” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202, for the 2026–27 fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 8, Sec. 10.   (AB 121)   Effective June 27, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

14041.65.

(a) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 14041.6, for the 2010–11 fiscal year only, warrants for the principal apportionments for the month of February in the amount of twenty-four million seven hundred thousand dollars ($24,700,000) instead shall be drawn in July of the same calendar year pursuant to the certification made pursuant to Section 41339.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 14041.6, for the 2010–11 fiscal year only, warrants for the principal apportionments for the month of February in the amount of one billion four hundred five million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,405,500,000) instead shall be drawn in August of the same calendar year pursuant to the certification made pursuant to Section 41339.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 14041.6, for the 2010–11 fiscal year only, warrants for the principal apportionments for the month of February in the amount of five hundred sixty-nine million eight hundred thousand dollars ($569,800,000) instead shall be drawn in September of the same calendar year pursuant to the certification made pursuant to Section 41339.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (c) of Section 14041.6, for the 2010–11 fiscal year only, warrants for the principal apportionments for the month of April in the amount of four hundred nineteen million twenty thousand dollars ($419,020,000) instead shall be drawn in September of the same calendar year pursuant to the certification made pursuant to Section 41339.

(e) Notwithstanding subdivision (c) of Section 14041.6, for the 2010–11 fiscal year only,
 warrants for the principal apportionments for the month of May in the amount of eight hundred million dollars ($800,000,000) instead shall be drawn in September of the same calendar year pursuant to the certification made pursuant to Section 41339.

(f) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (i) of Section 14041.6, for the 2020–21 fiscal year only, warrants for the principal apportionment for the month of February 2021 scheduled to be drawn in November 2021, shall instead be drawn in August 2021 pursuant to the certification made pursuant to Section 41332.

(g) Notwithstanding subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (i) of Section 14041.6, for the 2020–21
 fiscal year only, warrants for the principal apportionment for the month of March 2021 scheduled to be drawn in October 2021, shall instead be drawn in August 2021 pursuant to the certification made pursuant to Section 41332.

(h) Notwithstanding subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (i) of Section 14041.6, for the 2020–21 fiscal year only, warrants for the principal apportionment for the month of April 2021 scheduled to be drawn in September 2021, shall instead be drawn in August 2021 pursuant to the certification made pursuant to Section 41332.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 44, Sec. 12.   (AB 130)   Effective July 9, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

14041.7.

(a) Commencing with the 2010–11 fiscal year, up to one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) of the amount of the warrants for the principal apportionments for the month of June, that are instead to be drawn in July pursuant to Section 14041.5, may be drawn in June, subject to the approval of the Director of Finance, for a charter school or school district as follows:

(1) In order for a charter school to receive a payment in June pursuant to this section, the governing body of the charter school, in consultation with the county superintendent of
 schools, shall certify to the Superintendent and the Director of Finance on or before April 1 that the deferral of warrants pursuant to Sections 14041.5 and 14041.6 will result in the charter school being unable to meet its financial obligations for June and shall provide the Superintendent an estimate of the amount of additional funds necessary for the charter school to meet its financial obligations for the month of June.

(2) In order for a school district to receive a payment in June pursuant to this section, the county superintendent of schools shall certify to the Superintendent and to the Director of Finance on or before April 1 that the deferral of warrants pursuant to Sections 14041.5 and 14041.6 will result in the school district being unable to meet its financial obligations for June and shall provide the Superintendent an estimate of the amount of additional funds necessary for the school district to meet its financial obligations
 for the month of June.

(3) The criteria, as applicable, set forth in statute and regulations to qualify a school district for an emergency apportionment shall be used to make the certification specified in paragraph (2).

(4) A charter school or school district may receive, pursuant to this section, no more than the lesser of the following:

(A) The total amount of additional funds necessary for the charter school or school district to meet its financial obligations for the month of June, as reported to the Superintendent pursuant to paragraph (1) or (2).

(B) The total payments the charter school or school district is entitled to receive in July for the prior fiscal year.

(b) If the total amount requested by charter schools and school districts pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) exceeds one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000), the Controller, Treasurer, and Director of Finance may authorize additional payments to meet these requests, but total payments to charter schools and school districts pursuant to this section shall not exceed three hundred million dollars ($300,000,000). No later than May 1, the Controller, Treasurer, and Director of Finance shall determine whether sufficient cash is available to make payments in excess of one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000). In making the determination that cash is sufficient to make additional payments, in whole or in part, the Controller, Treasurer, and Director of Finance shall consider costs for state government, the scope of any identified cash shortage, timing, achievability, legislative direction, and the impact and hardship imposed on potentially affected programs, entities, and related public
 services. The Department of Finance shall notify the Joint Legislative Budget Committee within 10 days of this determination and identify the total amount of requests that will be paid.

(c) If the total amount of cash made available pursuant to subdivision (b) is less than the amount requested pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a), payments to charter schools and school districts shall be prioritized according to the date on which notification was provided to the Superintendent and the Department of Finance.

(d) A charter school submitting a certification pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) shall provide its chartering authority with a copy of the certification.

(e) Payments pursuant to this section shall be made no later than June 20.

(f) Except as provided in subdivisions (c) and (e) of Section 41202, for purposes of making the computations required by Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the warrants drawn pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be deemed to be “General Fund revenues appropriated to school districts,” as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 41202, for the fiscal year in which the warrants are drawn and included within the
 “total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIII B,” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202, for the fiscal year in which the warrants are drawn.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 38, Sec. 29.   (SB 1016)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

14041.75.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 14041.7, for the 2011–12 fiscal year only, up to one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) of the amount of the warrants for the principal apportionments for the month of June, that are instead to be drawn in July pursuant to Section 14041.5, may be drawn in June, subject to the approval of the Director of Finance, for a charter school or school district as follows:

(1) In order for a charter school to receive a payment in June pursuant to this section, the chartering authority, in consultation with the county superintendent of schools, shall certify to the Superintendent and the Director of Finance on or before April 1 that the deferral of warrants pursuant to Sections
 14041.5 and 14041.6 will result in the charter school being unable to meet its financial obligations for June and shall provide the Superintendent an estimate of the amount of additional funds necessary for the charter school to meet its financial obligations for the month of June.

(2) In order for a school district to receive a payment in June pursuant to this section, the county superintendent of schools shall certify to the Superintendent and to the Director of Finance on or before April 1 that the deferral of warrants pursuant to Sections 14041.5 and 14041.6 will result in the school district being unable to meet its financial obligations for June and shall provide the Superintendent an estimate of the amount of additional funds necessary for the school district to meet its financial obligations for the month of June.

(3) The criteria, as applicable, set forth in statute and
 regulations to qualify a school district for an emergency apportionment shall be used to make the certification specified in paragraph (2).

(4) A charter school or school district may receive, pursuant to this section, no more than the amount of additional funds necessary for the charter school or school district to meet its financial obligations for the month of June, as reported to the Superintendent pursuant to paragraph (1) or (2).

(b) If the total amount requested by charter schools and school districts pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) exceeds one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000), the Controller, Treasurer, and Director of Finance may authorize additional payments to meet these requests, but total payments to charter schools and school districts pursuant to this section shall not exceed three hundred million dollars ($300,000,000). No later than May 1, the
 Controller, Treasurer, and Director of Finance shall determine whether sufficient cash is available to make payments in excess of one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000). In making the determination that cash is sufficient to make additional payments, in whole or in part, the Controller, Treasurer, and Director of Finance shall consider costs for state government, the scope of any identified cash shortage, timing, achievability, legislative direction, and the impact and hardship imposed on potentially affected programs, entities, and related public services. The Department of Finance shall notify the Joint Legislative Budget Committee within 10 days of this determination and identify the total amount of requests that will be paid.

(c) If the total amount of cash made available pursuant to subdivision (b) is less than the amount requested pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (a), payments to charter schools and school districts shall be
 prioritized according to the date on which notification was provided to the Superintendent and the Department of Finance.

(d) Payments pursuant to this section shall be made no later than June 20.

(e) Except as provided in subdivisions (c) and (e) of Section 41202, for purposes of making the computations required by Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the warrants drawn pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be deemed to be “General Fund revenues appropriated for school districts,” as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 41202, for the fiscal year in which the warrants are drawn and included within the “total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIII B,” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202, for the fiscal year in which the warrants are
 drawn.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 13, Sec. 1.   (AB 103)   Effective May 23, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

14041.8.

(a) (1) For the 2020–21 fiscal year only, up to one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) of the amount of the warrants for the principal apportionments for the month of February, that are instead to be drawn in November, pursuant to Section 14041.6, may be drawn in February, subject to the approval of the Director of Finance, for a charter school or school district as follows:

(A) In order for a charter school to receive a payment in February pursuant to this subdivision, the chartering authority, in consultation with the county superintendent of schools, shall certify to the Superintendent and the Director of Finance on or before December 15, 2020, that the deferral of warrants pursuant to Section 14041.6 will result in the charter
 school being unable to meet its financial obligations for February or any subsequent month until the deferral is repaid, and shall provide the Superintendent an estimate of the amount of additional funds necessary for the charter school to meet its financial obligations for February and any subsequent month until the deferral is repaid, as applicable.

(B) In order for a school district to receive a payment in February pursuant to this subdivision, the county superintendent of schools shall certify to the Superintendent and to the Director of Finance on or before December 15, 2020, that the deferral of warrants pursuant to Section 14041.6 will result in the school district being unable to meet its financial obligations for February or any subsequent month until the deferral is repaid, and shall provide the Superintendent an estimate of the amount of additional funds necessary for the school district to meet its financial obligations for February
 and any subsequent month until the deferral is repaid, as applicable.

(C) To make the certification specified in subparagraph (B), both of the following criteria shall be met:

(i) The school district must have exhausted all internal and external sources of borrowing including those pursuant to Sections 42603, 42620, 42621, and 42622 of this code, Article 7.6 (commencing with Section 53850) of Chapter 4 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code, and Section 6 of Article XVI of the California Constitution.
